Washington statutes.
RCW 43.380.020

Washington statewide reentry council—Created—Executive director.

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the Washington statewide reentry council is created and located within the department for the purpose of promoting successful reentry of offenders after incarceration.

(2) Through the executive director that may be appointed by the council, the department shall administer the council by:

(a) Providing the council and its executive director use of the department's facilities; and

(b) Managing grants and other funds received, used, and disbursed by the council.

[ 2021 c 243 s 12; (2021 c 334 s 984 repealed by 2023 c 475 s 1904); 2019 c 415 s 976; 2016 c 188 s 3.]

NOTES:

Conflict with federal requirements—Effective date—2021 c 334: See notes following RCW 43.79.555.

Findings—2021 c 243: See note following RCW 74.09.670.

Effective date—2019 c 415: See note following RCW 28B.20.476.